Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0732.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 243. (1) Not later than 30 days after the effective date
of the amendatory act that added this section, the commission shall
initiate a proceeding to develop requirements for programs of
electric providers whose rates are regulated by the commission to
allow aggregators and individual customer owners of behind-the-
meter eligible electric generators and demand response resources to
provide distribution and transmission system services, including,
but not limited to, services through grid-edge distributed energy
RMH S02283'25 (S-1) u9vn34


resources management systems. The commission shall adopt the
requirements within 1 year after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this section.
(2) The commission shall solicit input from stakeholders,
including, but not limited to, the department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy, electric providers whose rates are regulated by
the commission, industry representatives, stakeholders, and the
attorney general to develop the program requirements.
(3) The program requirements must include compensation for
grid services provided by behind-the-meter eligible electric
generators and demand response resources to effectively leverage
the value of behind-the-meter eligible electric generators and
demand response resources to achieve objectives, including, but not
limited to, the following:
(a) Increased resilience and reliability of the distribution
and transmission systems.
(b) Positive net present value or demonstrated savings to
ratepayers, including the avoidance of costly investments by
electric distribution companies.
(4) Compensation under subsection (3) must meet the following
requirements:
(a) Be based on publicly available utility marginal hourly
costs of grid services.
(b) Be sufficient to cover the full value of grid services
provided by behind-the-meter eligible electric generators and
demand response resources, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(i) Improved efficiency of the transmission and distribution
system.
RMH S02283'25 (S-1) u9vn34


(ii) Reduced peak demand.
(iii) Increased customer, local, or community resilience,
especially in areas with higher than average electric outages.
(iv) Ancillary services.
(v) Reduced supply capacity constraints.
(vi) Other grid services.
(5) The program requirements must meet all of the following
conditions:
(a) Be based on the best available data and design from
similarly designed programs in other states.
(b) Allow the owners of behind-the-meter eligible electric
generators and demand response resources or aggregators of grid
services provided by behind-the-meter eligible electric generators
and demand response resources to be compensated for the enrolled
available supply capacity and actual grid services provided to the
grid, subject to all of the following:
(i) The grid services may include, but are not limited to, any
of the following:
(A) Electric energy.
(B) Demand response.
(C) Load shifting.
(D) Generation shifting.
(E) Locational value.
(F) Voltage support or other ancillary services.
(ii) Greater compensation may be provided for deployment
scenarios that face greater economic hurdles or for customer
classes that are of low-to-moderate income, are located in
environmental justice communities, or have experienced higher than
average electric outages.
RMH S02283'25 (S-1) u9vn34


(iii) Owners of behind-the-meter eligible electric generators
and demand response resources or aggregators of grid services
provided by behind-the-meter eligible electric generators and
demand response resources may be compensated for multiple grid
services provided by an eligible electric generator or demand
response resource, but may not be compensated twice for the same
grid service.
(iv) Owners of multiple behind-the-meter eligible electric
generators or demand response resources, or both, may enroll
different resources through different aggregators.
(c) Apportion the costs of the compensation under subdivision
(b) to ratepayers using a methodology approved by the commission.
(d) Allow the owner of a behind-the-meter eligible electric
generator or demand response resource or an aggregator on the
owner's behalf to provide grid services to, or participate in, the
wholesale electricity market or any other utility program for which
the behind-the-meter eligible electric generator or demand response
resource is eligible.
(e) Ensure that the owner of a behind-the-meter eligible
electric generator or demand response resource or an aggregator of
the grid services provided by a behind-the-meter eligible electric
generator or demand response resource is not compensated for
provision of the same grid service in both the wholesale and retail
electricity markets.
(f) Prohibit investor-owned utility ownership of a behind-the-
meter eligible electric generator.
(g) Prohibit the imposition on the owner of a behind-the-meter
eligible electric generator or demand response resource or the
aggregator of the grid services provided by behind-the-meter
RMH S02283'25 (S-1) u9vn34


eligible electric generators or demand response resources of any
charge, fee, or insurance requirement not imposed on persons that
are not owners of behind-the-meter eligible electric generators or
demand response resources or aggregators of the grid services
provided by behind-the-meter eligible electric generators or demand
response resources. This subdivision does not apply to a fee or
other charge imposed on an aggregator for failure to meet
contractual obligations to electric providers or customers.
(h) Prohibit unreasonable program size limitations, including
unreasonable limitations on aggregator participation.
(i) Require aggregators to be registered with the commission.
The commission shall issue orders establishing an annual
registration procedure for all aggregators. To ensure adequate
service to customers in this state, the commission shall ensure
that an aggregator has the necessary financial, managerial, and
technical capabilities, shall require that an aggregator maintain
records that the commission considers necessary, and shall ensure
an aggregator's accessibility to the commission, to consumers, and
to electric utilities in this state. An aggregator is not required
to obtain any certificate, license, or authorization from the
commission other than as required by this section and sections 244
to 246.
(j) Provide appropriate and reasonable consumer protections
and standards for entry into the program as determined by the
commission, which may include requirements for standard contract
terms and disclosure forms, payment terms, warranties, and data
privacy provisions.
(k) Prohibit penalties or requirements for preapproval for
normal operation of behind-the-meter eligible electric generators,
RMH S02283'25 (S-1) u9vn34


including during program events.
(l) Allow and enable participating customers to expeditiously
share their customer information with aggregators.
Sec. 244. (1) Not later than 90 days after the commission
adopts program requirements under section 243, each electric
provider whose rates are regulated by the commission shall file
with the commission a proposed program that complies with the
program requirements. The proposal may provide for program
implementation by a third party. The electric utility may include
reasonable requirements for participation consistent with this
subsection, not including any requirements of collateral from
owners of behind-the-meter eligible electric generators or demand
response resources, or an aggregator. The commission shall approve
the programs, with or without modification, in the order resolving
the rate case filing.
(2) The commission shall ensure that, to the extent
practicable, the methodology for determining the valuation of
services provided by behind-the-meter eligible electric generators
and demand response resources is consistent across electric
providers.
Sec. 245. An owner or aggregator of behind-the-meter eligible
electric generators or demand response resources that participates
in an approved program under section 244 is not an electric
supplier, electric utility, or a person conducting an electric
utility business.
Sec. 246. (1) When the applicable regional transmission
organization implements Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Order
2222, the commission shall determine if the manner in which the
order is implemented requires any modification of the program
RMH S02283'25 (S-1) u9vn34


requirements adopted under section 243 to increase program
participation.
(2) Not later than 1 year after the effective date of this
section, and every 2 years thereafter, the commission shall prepare
and submit to the legislature a report that contains both of the
following:
(a) Findings and recommendations regarding the program
requirements.
(b) Recommendations for legislative action, including, but not
limited to, action to do any the following:
(i) Stabilize the power supply.
(ii) Better integrate renewable energy systems.
(iii) Reduce peak demand.
(iv) Reduce costs to ratepayers.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01936'25) or House Bill
No. ____ (request no. H01936'25) of the 103rd Legislature is
enacted into law.
Final Page
RMH S02283'25 (S-1) u9vn34